Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
198]

CONSERVATION
EASEMENTS

Section

198-1 Conservation easement defined

198-2 Nature

198-3 Holders

198-4 Recordation

198-5 Enforcement of easement

198-6 Construction

Cross References

Allowance of
indigenous Hawaiian architecture by county ordinances, see §46-1.55.

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Public access to
coastal and inland recreational areas, see chapter 115.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next